Vermont, session 2025-2026, H805.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 913 is amended to read:
§ 913. PROHIBITION
(a)(1) Except for allowed uses adopted by the Department by rule, no
person shall conduct or allow to be conducted an activity in a significant
wetland or buffer zone of a significant wetland except in compliance with a
permit, conditional use determination, or order issued by the Secretary.
(2) The Department shall issue general permits for classes of activity in
a significant wetland or the buffer zone of a significant wetland that do not
require Department review when the activity will have only a minor
disturbance on the wetland. The Secretary shall give deference to a
certification by a licensed engineer with respect to the engineering design of an
allowed use in a wetland or to judgment exercised by the engineer, provided
that the licensed engineer certifies that, in the exercise of the engineer’s
reasonable professional judgment, the information submitted with the permit
application is true and correct and the activity proposed in the permit
VT LEG #385950 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.805
2026 Page 3 of 11
application complies with the rules adopted under this chapter regarding
activity in a wetland.
(b) A permit shall not be required under this section for:
(1) any activity that occurred before the effective date of this section
unless the activity occurred within:
(A) an area identified as a wetland on the Vermont significant
wetlands inventory maps;
(B) a wetland that was contiguous to an area identified as a wetland
on the Vermont significant wetlands inventory maps; or
(C) the buffer zone of a wetland referred to in subdivision (A) or (B)
of this subdivision (1);
(2) any construction within a wetland that is identified on the Vermont
significant wetlands inventory maps or within the buffer zone of such a
wetland, provided that the construction was completed prior to February 23,
1992, and no action for which a permit is required under the rules of the
Department was taken or caused to be taken on or after February 23, 1992.
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 1264(g) is amended to read:
(g) General permits.
(1) The Secretary may issue general permits for classes of stormwater
runoff that shall be adopted and administered in accordance with the provisions
of subsection 1263(b) of this title.
VT LEG #385950 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.805
2026 Page 4 of 11
* * *
(4) The Secretary shall issue a general permit under this subsection for
minor construction, development, or expansion of impervious surface that does
not require review by the Secretary where the risk of harm from stormwater
runoff is low. The Secretary shall give deference to a certification by a
licensed engineer with respect to the engineering design of a stormwater
system under this section or to judgment exercised by the licensed engineer,
provided that the licensed engineer certifies that, in the exercise of the
engineer’s reasonable professional judgment, the information submitted with
the permit application is true and correct and the design or mitigation proposed
in the permit application complies with the rules adopted under this chapter
regarding management of stormwater runoff.
Sec. 3. 10 V.S.A. § 1973 is amended to read:
§ 1973. PERMITS
(a) Except as provided in this section and sections 1974 and 1978 of this
title, a person shall obtain a permit from the Secretary before:
(1) subdividing land;
(2) creating or modifying a campground in a manner that affects a
potable water supply or wastewater system or the requirements for providing
potable water and wastewater disposal;
VT LEG #385950 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.805
2026 Page 5 of 11
(3) constructing, replacing, or modifying a potable water supply or
wastewater system;
(4) using or operating a failed supply or failed system;
(5) constructing a new building or structure;
(6) modifying an existing building or structure in a manner that
increases the design flow or modifies other operational requirements of a
potable water supply or wastewater system;
(7) making a new or modified connection to a new or existing potable
water supply or wastewater system; or
(8) changing the use of a building or structure in a manner that increases
the design flows or modifies other operational requirements of a potable water
supply or wastewater system.
* * *
(d) No permit shall be issued by the Secretary unless the Secretary receives
a statement from a licensed designer certifying that, in the exercise of his or
her the licensed designer’s reasonable professional judgment, the design-
related information submitted with the permit application is true and correct
and the design included in an application for a permit complies with the rules.
* * *
(f)(1) The Secretary shall give deference to a certification by a licensed
designer with respect to the engineering design or judgment exercised by the
VT LEG #385950 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.805
2026 Page 6 of 11
designer in order to minimize Agency review of certified designs. Nothing in
this section shall limit the responsibility of the licensed designer to comply
with all standards and rules, or the authority of the Secretary to review and
comment on design aspects of an application or to enforce Agency rules with
respect to the design or the design certification.
* * *
(3) The Secretary may issue general permits for classes of activity that
require a permit under subsection (a) of this section that do not require
Department review when the activity will pose only a minor risk of harm to
human health or the environment.
(4) The Secretary shall issue a permit under this chapter for a potable
water supply or wastewater system serving a residential flow of 1,000 gallons
per day or less after reviewing the design-related information submitted by a
licensed designer only for administrative compliance with the requirements of
this chapter and the rules adopted under this chapter.
(g) If there is a dispute between the Secretary and a professional engineer
concerning the design prepared by a professional engineer or the judgment
exercised by a professional engineer, the professional engineer may request
that the disputed issues be reviewed by a licensed professional engineer
employed or retained by the Secretary. The Secretary shall grant all such
requests for review.
VT LEG #385950 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.805
2026 Page 7 of 11
* * *
Sec. 4. 10 V.S.A. § 1978 is amended to read:
§ 1978. RULES
(a) The Secretary shall adopt rules, in accordance with 3 V.S.A. chapter 25,
necessary for the administration of this chapter. These rules shall include the
following:
(1) Performance standards for wastewater systems.
(2) Design flow standards for potable water supplies and wastewater
systems.
(3) Design requirements, including isolation distances.
(4) Monitoring and reporting requirements.
(5) Soils and hydrogeologic requirements.
(6) Operation and maintenance requirements appropriate to the
complexity of the system.
(7) Requirements for engineering plans and specifications for potable
water supplies and wastewater systems.
(8) Provisions for the acceptance and approval of alternative or
innovative technologies, based on performance evaluations provided by
qualified organizations with expertise in wastewater systems, including the
New England Interstate Water Pollution Control Commission.
VT LEG #385950 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.805
2026 Page 8 of 11
(9) Provisions allowing the use of a variety of alternative or innovative
technologies, including intermittent sand filters, recirculating sand filters,
waterless toilets, and greywater disposal systems, and constructed wetlands,
that provide an adequate degree of protection of human health and the
environment. When alternative or innovative technologies are approved for
general use, the rules shall not require either a bond or the immediate
construction of a duplicate wastewater system for those alternative or
innovative technologies.
(10) Provisions allowing for appropriate reductions in leachfield size,
depth to the seasonal high water table, or other minimum site conditions when
the wastewater system design does not solely rely on naturally occurring soils
to provide an adequate degree of treatment, and when those systems, combined
with the reductions, provide an adequate degree of protection of human health
and the environment.
(11) Provisions allowing for experimental systems.
(12) Provisions regarding the licensing of certain classes of designers.
(13) Provisions regarding the delegation of authority to and removal of
authority from a municipality to administer this chapter.
(14) Other requirements necessary to protect human health and the
environment.
VT LEG #385950 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.805
2026 Page 9 of 11
(15) Provisions authorizing the use by a residential dwelling of surface
water as a source of a potable water supply permitted under this chapter.
(b) The Secretary may, by rule, establish permitting exemptions upon a
determination that those exemptions are consistent with the purposes of this
chapter, and are necessary for the appropriate implementation of this chapter.
* * *
(g)(1) The Secretary shall, by rule, identify criteria or technical standards
for a permit for owner-occupied residences issued under this chapter that shall
be waived or reduced if:
(A) the applicant can demonstrate alternative, engineered solutions
that mitigate the possible harm from a failed wastewater system or potable
water supply; or
(B) the applicant files with the permit and other documents required
under subsection 1973(h) of this title to be filed in the town records a statement
assuming all liability for all damages incurred from the installation or failure of
the wastewater system or potable water supply.
(2) The rule required under this subsection shall allow for reduced
length of a mound wastewater system and reduced isolation distances between
wastewater systems and potable water supplies.
VT LEG #385950 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.805
2026 Page 10 of 11
Sec. 5. 32 V.S.A. § 3622 is added to read:
§ 3622. LAND WITH STATE-IMPOSED DEVELOPMENT
RESTRICTIONS
(a) The portion of a parcel of land owned by a resident of the State that is
wetlands or Tier 3 land shall be valued at the lesser of:
(1) fair market value; or
(2) the use value of forest land, as determined by the Current Use
Advisory Board for the current year.
(b) As used in this section:
(1) “Tier 3 land” means land determined to be part of a Tier 3 area
pursuant to 10 V.S.A. chapter 151 and any related administrative rules.
(2) “Wetlands” means land listed as Class I wetlands by administrative
rule, land mapped as Class II wetlands on the Vermont Significant Wetlands
Inventory, or land determined by the Secretary of Natural Resources to be
significant wetlands under 10 V.S.A. § 914. “Wetlands” includes buffer zones
required by the Secretary of Natural Resources around Class I and II wetlands.
Sec. 6. 1 V.S.A. § 312 is amended to read:
§ 312. RIGHT TO ATTEND MEETINGS OF PUBLIC BODIES
(a)(1) All meetings of a public body are declared to be open to the public at
all times, except as provided in section 313 of this title. No resolution, rule,
regulation, appointment, or formal action shall be considered binding except as
VT LEG #385950 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.805
2026 Page 11 of 11
taken or made at such open meeting, except as provided under subdivision
313(a)(2) of this title. A meeting of a public body is subject to the public
accommodation requirements of 9 V.S.A. chapter 139. A public body shall
electronically record all public hearings held to provide a forum for public
comment on a proposed rule, pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 840. The public shall
have access to copies of such electronic recordings as described in section 316
of this title.
* * *
(g) The provisions of this subchapter shall not apply to site inspections for
the purpose of assessing damage or making tax assessments or abatements,
clerical work, or work assignments of staff or other personnel. Routine, day-
to-day administrative matters that do not require action by the public body may
be conducted outside a duly warned meeting, provided that no money is
appropriated, expended, or encumbered. Site visits by a District Commission
or its members as part of the permitting process under 10 V.S.A. chapter 151
are not subject to the requirements of this subchapter.
* * *
Sec. 7. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385950 v.1